Maryland, session 2025, HB0661.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
22–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Employee organization” means a labor organization in which public
employees OR FACULTY, AS DEFINED IN § 3–101 OF THE STATE PERSONNEL AND
PENSIONS ARTICLE, participate and that has as one of its primary purposes representing
public employees.
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
3–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the Public Employee Relations Board.
(c) “Chancellor” has the meaning stated in § 12–101 of the Education Article.
(d) “Collective bargaining” means:
(1) good faith negotiations by authorized representatives of employees and
their employer with the intention of:
(i) 1. reaching an agreement about wages, hours, and other
terms and conditions of employment; and
2. incorporating the terms of the agreement in a written
memorandum of understanding or other written understanding; or
(ii) clarifying terms and conditions of employment;
(2) administration of terms and conditions of employment; or
(3) the voluntary adjustment of a dispute or disagreement between
authorized representatives of employees and their employer that arises under a
memorandum of understanding or other written understanding.

HOUSE BILL 661 3
(e) “Employee organization” has the meaning stated in § 22–101 of the State
Government Article.
(f) “Exclusive representative” has the meaning stated in § 22–101 of the State
Government Article.
(G) (1) “FACULTY” MEANS FULL–TIME, PART–TIME, OR ADJUNCT
EMPLOYEES OF A SYSTEM INSTITUTION, MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY, OR ST.
MARY’S COLLEGE OF MARYLAND WHOSE ASSIGNMENTS INVOLVE ACADEMIC
RESPONSIBILITIES, INCLUDING TEACHERS, RESEARCHERS, AND DEPARTMENT
HEADS AND THOSE IN COMPARABLE POSITIONS.
(2) “FACULTY” INCLUDES TENURE TRACK, NONTENURE TRACK, AND
TENURED EMPLOYEES.
(3) “FACULTY” DOES NOT INCLUDE OFFICERS, SUPERVISORY
EMPLOYEES, CONFIDENTIAL EMPLOYEES, OR STUDENT EMPLOYEES.
[(g)] (H) (1) “Faculty at the Maryland School for the Deaf” means employees
who have been granted the following status by the Board of Trustees of the Maryland
School for the Deaf:
(i) after–school program counselors;
(ii) American Sign Language specialists;
(iii) athletic trainers;
(iv) behavior specialists;
(v) clerical aides;
(vi) dorm counselors;
(vii) employment specialists;
(viii) instructional technology resource specialists;
(ix) librarians;
(x) literacy and reading specialists;
(xi) occupational therapists;
(xii) orientation and mobility specialists;

HOUSE BILL 661
(xiii) physical therapists;
(xiv) school counselors;
(xv) school IEP coordinators;
(xvi) school nurses;
(xvii) school social workers;
(xviii) speech–language pathologists;
(xix) student support specialists;
(xx) teachers;
(xxi) teacher aides;
(xxii) transition coordinators; and
(xxiii) work–to–learn specialists.
(2) “Faculty at the Maryland School for the Deaf” does not include officers
or supervisory employees at the Maryland School for the Deaf.
[(h)] (I) “President” means:
(1) with regard to a constituent institution, as defined in § 12–101 of the
Education Article, the president of the constituent institution;
(2) with regard to a center or institute, as those terms are defined in §
12–101 of the Education Article, the president of the center or institute;
(3) with regard to the University System of Maryland Office, the
Chancellor of the University System of Maryland; and
(4) with regard to Morgan State University, St. Mary’s College of
Maryland, and Baltimore City Community College, the president of the institution.
[(i)] (J) “System institution” means:
(1) a constituent institution, as defined in § 12–101 of the Education
Article;
(2) a center or institute, as those terms are defined in § 12–101 of the
Education Article; and

HOUSE BILL 661 5
(3) the University System of Maryland Office.
3–102.
(b) This title does not apply to:
(9) an employee of the University System of Maryland, Morgan State
University, St. Mary’s College of Maryland, or Baltimore City Community College who is:
(i) a chief administrator or in a comparable position;
(ii) a deputy, associate, or assistant administrator or in a
comparable position;
(iii) [a member of the faculty, including a faculty librarian;
(iv)] a student employee, including a teaching assistant or a
comparable position, fellow, or post doctoral intern;
[(v)] (IV) a contingent, contractual, temporary, or emergency
employee, EXCEPT FOR FACULTY;
[(vi)] (V) a contingent, contractual, or temporary employee whose
position is funded through a research or service grant or contract, or through clinical
revenues, EXCEPT FOR FACULTY; or
[(vii)] (VI) an employee whose regular place of employment is outside
the State of Maryland, EXCEPT FOR FACULTY;
(10) an employee whose participation in a labor organization would be
contrary to the State’s ethics laws;
(11) any managerial or confidential employee of a unit of State government
listed in subsection (a)(1)(i) through (iv) and (vi) through (xii) of this section, as defined in
regulations adopted by the Secretary;
(12) any supervisory, managerial, or confidential employee of a State
institution of higher education listed in subsection (a)(1)(v) of this section[, as defined in
regulations adopted by the governing board of the institution]; or
(13) any employee described in subsection (a)(2) of this section who is a
supervisory, managerial, or confidential employee, as defined in regulations adopted by the
Secretary.

HOUSE BILL 661
(d) (2) (i) [Each] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, EACH system institution, Morgan State University, St. Mary’s College
of Maryland, and Baltimore City Community College shall have separate bargaining units.
(ii) Appropriate bargaining units shall consist of:
1. all eligible nonexempt employees, as described in the
federal Fair Labor Standards Act, except eligible sworn police officers;
2. all eligible exempt employees, as described in the federal
Fair Labor Standards Act; [and]
3. all eligible sworn police officers;
4. FACULTY, EXCEPT CONTINGENT, CONTRACTUAL, OR
TEMPORARY FACULTY; AND
5. CONTINGENT, CONTRACTUAL, OR TEMPORARY
FACULTY.
(III) THE BARGAINING UNITS DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH
(II)4 AND 5 OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY CHOOSE TO COMBINE INTO A SINGLE
BARGAINING UNIT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.